Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 1 COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION
23-1-119.3. Department directive - exchange of student records.

The department of higher education and the department of education shall establish a procedure that allows for the direct, electronic exchange of student unit record data for students enrolled in Colorado public high schools.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 22-2-111 (3)(a), C.R.S., the department of higher education, in collaboration with the department of education, shall identify the student data relevant to high school students' transitions to the postsecondary system to which the department of education has access and that shall be shared with the department of higher education.

The department of education shall collect student authorization for the transfer of data where necessary and practicable through existing systems for the collection of student data.

The implementation of the data exchange procedure established pursuant to this section and section 22-7-1016.5, C.R.S., must utilize student unit record data collected and maintained by the department of education and must be administered at no charge to local education providers, public institutions of higher education, or students.

The data exchange procedure established pursuant to this section and section 22-7-1016.5 must ensure that the exchange of information is conducted in compliance with all state and federal laws and regulations concerning the privacy of information, including but not limited to the federal "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g, as amended, and all federal regulations and applicable guidelines adopted in accordance therewith.

In compliance with all state and federal laws and regulations concerning the privacy of information, including but not limited to the federal "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g, as amended, and all federal regulations and applicable guidelines adopted in accordance therewith, the department of higher education shall share student unit record data with Colorado public institutions of higher education for recruitment, enrollment, and placement purposes.

The department of higher education may use Colorado public high school students' student unit record data to provide students with relevant information concerning the transition from high school to colleges and universities.

To the extent practicable and subject to available data and resources, the department of higher education may use the data obtained pursuant to this section for purposes of fulfilling the requirements of section 23-1-119.1 and 23-1-119.2, as well as in the admission of eligible students to public institutions of higher education.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-053), ch. 112, p. 386, § 3, effective April 8.

L. 2017:

(5) and (6) amended, (SB 17-294), ch. 264, p. 1398, § 55, effective May 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2013 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 112, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

23-1-119.5. Online career platform - appropriations from Colorado work force development council.

Beginning on September 14, 2020, the department of higher education may receive and expend any money transferred to the department by the Colorado work force development council created in section 24-46.3-101, for the purposes of implementing and maintaining the online platform created pursuant to section 24-46.3-106, disseminating information regarding the online platform, and providing training about the online platform.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1396), ch. 138, p. 600, § 6, effective September 14.

23-1-120. Commission directive - incentives for improvement initiative grants.

The general assembly finds that state encouragement would contribute to improving the quality and efficiency of the postsecondary education system in Colorado. Therefore, the general assembly finds and declares that an incentives for improvement initiative grant program should be implemented to encourage initiatives at state institutions of higher education demonstrating innovative solutions and successful approaches to increasing efficiency, productivity, quality, and diversity in the Colorado postsecondary education system through a system of competitive matching grants to such institutions.

The governing boards of state institutions of higher education, including local district community colleges, or a consortia of such institutions may apply for grants from the commission by submitting proposals for initiatives at their institutions to be designated as incentives for improvement. As used in this section, "incentives for improvement initiative" means any academic initiative of a state institution of higher education that, consistent with the statewide master plan for Colorado postsecondary education, is developed to achieve greater efficiency, productivity, quality, and diversity.

The commission, after consultation with the governing boards and the education committees of both houses of the general assembly, shall identify areas of statewide interest in the postsecondary education system and develop criteria to be employed in evaluating proposals for incentives for improvement at state institutions of higher education. Such criteria shall be developed on or before August 1, 1992. The criteria developed by the commission to evaluate such proposals, designate recipients, and award grants shall take into account the following:

The commitment by the governing board to provide matching funds pursuant to subsection (5) of this section for a period not to exceed five years;

The level of institutional commitment to the initiative measured partially in terms of the reallocation of existing resources to the support of the initiative;

Whether the initiative includes measures for performance evaluation that will assist and enhance existing methods of assessment and that demonstrate how the initiative improves efficiency, productivity, quality, and diversity;

Consistency with the goals identified in the statewide master plan and institutional academic master plan;

The degree of collaboration with business, industry, and other public entities in forming partnerships to enhance the quality of the educational experience; and

Such additional criteria as the commission may determine to be appropriate.

Grant applications and proposals by the governing boards shall be submitted to the commission by November 1, 1992. Employing the criteria established pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the commission shall designate an initial list of initiatives to be designated incentives for improvement and shall provide to the general assembly such list, an analysis of the projected funding requirements of the initiative, the proposed grants, and a plan for the support and enhancement of said initiatives. The list of initiatives and proposed grants shall be delivered to the general assembly annually, on or before January 1, commencing January 1, 1993. Initial grants may be awarded to the governing boards of such institutions for the implementation of such programs on or before July 1, 1993. Incentives for improvement designations shall be reviewed annually by the commission.

Any grant awarded pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall be made annually for a period not to exceed five years, with receipt in any year of such a grant being dependent upon the state institution providing matching funds for such year from existing resources of such institution and any private contributions in the following amount:

During the first three years of the initiative, an amount equaling forty to sixty percent of the annual grant; or

During the fourth and fifth years of the initiative, an amount equaling sixty-five to eighty-five percent of the annual grant.

In determining the precise matching fund requirements for each institution selected for an improvement initiative, the commission shall give consideration to the size of the institutional budget and the percentage of such budget that is state general fund moneys.

The general assembly may make a separate annual appropriation to the commission, subject to available revenues, in an amount not to exceed one percent of the total annual department of higher education general fund appropriation to governing boards to be used to award incentives for improvement initiative grants. The total amount appropriated annually by the general assembly shall be allocated annually by the commission.

The commission, in consultation with the governing boards, shall adopt policies necessary to carry out the direction of this section and may, in furtherance of such policies, establish and implement:

A peer review process involving representation of the governing boards;

A schedule for directing grants to areas of statewide interest within the postsecondary education system;

A method for incorporating the cost of a successful incentives for improvement initiative into the annual appropriation to the governing board of an institution implementing such initiative upon completion of the five years of matching grants for such initiative; and

A system for the dissemination of information on successful and unsuccessful incentives for improvement initiatives as well as information on applying for grants under this section.

Repealed.

The commission shall promulgate such policies as may be necessary for the implementation of this section.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 564, § 1, effective May 14.

L. 96:

(3)(c) amended, p. 790, § 3, effective May 23; (8) repealed, p. 1835, § 15, effective June 5.

23-1-120.9. Department directive - collaborative educator preparation grant program - created - reporting - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1003), ch. 220, p. 852, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 18-1332), ch. 185, p. 1248, § 1, effective April 30.

L. 2019:

Entire section repealed, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1821, § 5, effective May 10.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to part 2 of article 78 of this title 23 in 2019.

23-1-121. Commission directive - approval of educator preparation programs - review - report - legislative declaration.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Approved educator preparation program" means an educator preparation program that has been reviewed pursuant to the provisions of this section and has been determined by the commission to meet the performance-based standards established by the commission pursuant to this section and the requirements of section 23-1-108.

"Candidate" means a person who is participating in an initial, advanced, or other preparation program for education professionals in order to enter the education profession.

"Institution of higher education" means a public, private, or proprietary postsecondary institution authorized by the commission to offer educator preparation programs.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-245), ch. 201, p. 842, § 2, effective August 10, 2011.)

"Program" means a planned sequence of undergraduate, post-baccalaureate, or graduate courses and experiences for the purpose of preparing teachers and other school professionals to be effective educators in prekindergarten through twelfth grade settings. A program may lead to a degree, a recommendation for a state license by the department of education, both, or neither.

"Unit" means the college, school, department, or other administrative body in a college, university, or other organization with the responsibility for managing or coordinating all programs offered for the initial and advanced preparation of educators, regardless of where the programs are administratively housed in an institution.

The commission shall adopt policies establishing the requirements for educator preparation programs offered by institutions of higher education. The department shall work in cooperation with the state board of education in developing the requirements for educator preparation programs. At a minimum, the requirements must ensure that each educator preparation program complies with section 23-1-125, is designed on a performance-based model, and includes:

Program design around a shared vision of candidate proficiency and professionalism that supports decision-making about partnerships and the integration of curricula, learners, and course work and clinical experiences;

Mapping, planning, development, assessment, and support of candidate proficiencies, including candidates' deep understanding of content knowledge, pedagogical knowledge, the content knowledge required for educating, and the dispositions and professional qualities necessary to be successful;

With regard to teacher and principal preparation programs, courses that provide content knowledge as described in part 10 of article 7 of title 22, specifically in teaching to the state preschool through elementary and secondary education standards adopted pursuant to section 22-7-1005;

Course work that teaches teacher candidates the science of reading, including the foundational reading skills of phonemic awareness, phonics, vocabulary development, reading fluency including oral skills, and reading comprehension, and the skills and strategies to apply to ensure that every student learns to read. Reading course work and field practice opportunities must be a significant focus for teachers preparing for endorsement in elementary, early childhood, or special education.

Course work that provides educator candidates with an overview of Title II of the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended, and its implementing regulations; section 504 of the federal "Rehabilitation Act of 1973", 29 U.S.C. sec. 701 et seq., as amended, and its implementing regulations; the "Individuals with Disabilities Education Act", 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq., as amended, and its implementing regulations; individualized education programs; and child find and that teaches educators effective special education classroom practices, including but not limited to inclusive learning environments;

Intentional clinical experience, early and throughout preparation, relating to predetermined state content standards, which experiences afford candidates multiple, intentional experiences to learn from practice. Clinical experiences must be aligned with program curricula so that candidates develop pedagogical skills and pedagogical content knowledge. Teacher preparation candidates must complete a minimum of eight hundred hours, and principal and administrator candidates must complete a minimum of three hundred hours, of clinical practice. A teacher candidate must complete the hours of clinical practice while enrolled in an approved educator preparation program; except that a program, after review, may accept clinical practice hours completed before enrolling in the program. A majority of the clinical practice hours must be completed through a continuous placement. For every additional endorsement or advanced degree, a candidate must complete an appropriate period of supervised field experiences that relate to predetermined standards, including best practices and relevant national norms related to the candidate's endorsements.

A requirement that each teacher candidate in an initial licensure program complete at least one semester or quarter-length course in behavioral health training using culturally responsive and trauma- and evidence-informed practices;

A requirement that each candidate, prior to graduation, must demonstrate the skills required for licensure, as specified by rule of the state board of education pursuant to section 22-2-109 (3), in the manner specified by rule of the state board;

A requirement that preparation program faculty, to improve their work, must engage in continuous evidence-based cycles of self-reflection and review regarding the impact of their programs on their candidates' development throughout the programs. These cycles must include data on current candidates throughout the program and available data on program completers.

The commission shall also adopt policies to ensure that each educator preparation program offered by an institution of higher education includes implementation of procedures to monitor and improve the effectiveness of the program, as well as the effectiveness of its graduates pursuant to section 22-9-105.5, C.R.S., including at a minimum the following:

Periodic review by the institution of higher education offering the educator preparation program to ensure that the program meets the requirements specified by the commission pursuant to this section;

Implementation of a procedure for collecting and reviewing evaluative data concerning the educator preparation program, which shall include periodic surveys of graduates and employers and educator identifier system data, pursuant to section 22-2-112 (1)(q), C.R.S., for modifying the program as necessary in response to the data collected;

Implementation of a procedure for reviewing the scores achieved on the professional competency assessments required pursuant to section 22-60.5-201, C.R.S., by candidates enrolled in and graduating from the program and modifying the program as necessary to improve those scores.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-245), ch. 201, p. 842, § 2, effective August 10, 2011.)

The department, in conjunction with the department of education, shall review each educator preparation program offered by an institution of higher education as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section and shall establish a schedule for review of each educator preparation program that ensures each program is reviewed as provided in this section not more frequently than once every five years; except that, if a program is placed on conditional approval or probationary status, the program must receive additional reviews within the five-year period, as determined by the department. Reviews of or decisions made concerning a program after it is placed on conditional approval or probationary status do not change the date of the program's next five-year review, as determined by the department.
(4) (a) (I) The department, in conjunction with the department of education, shall review each educator preparation program offered by an institution of higher education as provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section and shall establish a schedule for review of each educator preparation program that ensures each program is reviewed as provided in this section not more frequently than once every five years; except that, if a program is placed on conditional approval or probationary status, the program must receive additional reviews within the five-year period, as determined by the department. Reviews of or decisions made concerning a program after it is placed on conditional approval or probationary status do not change the date of the program's next five-year review, as determined by the department.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1476, 16, effective May 28, 2008.)

An institution of higher education that chooses to offer a new educator preparation program or modify an existing program, by significantly modifying the content, field experiences, or program delivery, shall submit the new or modified program to the department for review pursuant to this section. The commission shall adopt policies and procedures for the review of new and modified programs.

(I.5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (4)(a)(I) of this section to the contrary, if a new unit is approved and offers a new educator preparation program, the department shall review the new educator preparation program no sooner than twelve months but not more than twenty-four months after the new educator preparation program is initially approved.

Each program review conducted pursuant to subsection (4)(a) of this section must ensure that the program meets the minimum requirements adopted pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section and the requirements of section

23-1-108

and any policies adopted pursuant thereto. In determining whether to initially approve or continue the approval of an educator preparation program, the commission shall consider any recommendations made by the state board of education pursuant to section

22-2-109 (5)

concerning the effectiveness of the program content. If the state board of education recommends that a program not be approved or be placed on conditional approval or probation, the commission shall follow the recommendation by refusing initial approval of the program, placing the program on conditional approval, or placing the program on probation.

The department shall work cooperatively with each institution of higher education that offers an educator preparation program to obtain any data requested by the department to determine the admission and enrollment patterns, completion rates, and effectiveness of educator preparation programs offered by the institution. In addition, each institution of higher education shall, upon request from the department, prepare and submit an annual report to assist the department in reviewing the educator preparation programs pursuant to this section. The department shall collaborate with representatives from the governing boards of each institution of higher education that offer educator preparation programs in specifying the information to be included in the annual report.

Following review of an educator preparation program, if the commission determines that the program does not meet the requirements specified in subsection (4)(b) of this section, it shall grant the program conditional approval, place the program on probation, or terminate the program. The commission shall adopt policies specifying the procedures for placing a program on conditional approval, placing a program on probation, and terminating a program, including a procedure for appeal; the length of time that a program may remain on conditional approval or probation; and the process by which the level of approval of a program is reviewed and changed.

A program that the commission places on conditional approval may continue to accept new students. A program that the commission places on probation must not accept new students until the commission removes the program from probationary status.

If the commission determines that termination of the approval of a program is necessary, the program must be terminated within four years after the determination.

If the commission places a program on conditional approval or probation based on the recommendation of the state board of education, the commission shall consult with the state board of education in determining as provided in subsection (4)(d)(II) or (4)(d)(III) of this section whether the program should subsequently be reapproved, conditionally approved, placed on probation, or terminated.

The commission shall adopt policies and procedures, including a procedure for appeal, to discontinue any educator preparation program at an institution of higher education that has not had any candidate successfully graduate during the previous five years.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-245), ch. 201, p. 842, § 2, effective August 10, 2011.)

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, the department shall annually prepare a report concerning the enrollment in, graduation rates from, and effectiveness of the review of educator preparation programs authorized by the commission. In addition, the report must include data on the outcomes of graduates of educator preparation programs pursuant to section 22-2-112 (1)(q). The report must also state the percentage of educator candidates graduating from each program during the preceding twelve months who applied for and received an initial license pursuant to section 22-60.5-201 and the percentage of the graduates who passed the assessments administered pursuant to section 22-60.5-203, including the percentage of graduates who passed the assessments on the first attempt. For purposes of completing the report required pursuant to this subsection (6), the department of higher education and the department of education shall share any relevant data that complies with state and federal regulations with the other agency. The department shall submit the report to the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees.

The general assembly finds and declares that a high-quality teacher is the most important in-school factor for student achievement and students benefit from seeing a diverse group of educators in school classrooms. However, the educator workforce in Colorado is not as diverse as the population of students it serves or will serve in the future.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that educator preparation programs must clearly and transparently show the first-time pass rates of candidates, especially those candidates who are of a gender, race, or ethnicity that is underrepresented in the educator workforce, and that diverse educator candidates should have access to the necessary information to determine which educator preparation program gives the candidate the best chance of success at becoming an educator.

Commencing with the report in 2021, to the extent possible, all data and information required to be reported annually pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section must be disaggregated by the gender, race, and ethnicity of the candidates and graduates.

The department of higher education and the department of education shall post the department of higher education's annual report, required pursuant to subsection (6)(a) of this section, on each department's website in the location relating to teacher preparation programs and teacher licensure, as applicable.

The general assembly encourages the department to collaborate with national accrediting bodies of educator preparation and to offer concurrent and joint site visits to educator preparation programs at institutions of higher education to the extent feasible.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1049, § 11, effective June 3.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 462, § 14, effective August 6; entire section amended, p. 951, § 11, effective August 6.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 993, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1183, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(5) and (6) amended, p. 1115, § 4, effective May 26; (1)(a) and (4)(b) amended, p. 1546, § 7, effective August 2.

L. 2005:

(6) amended, p. 189, § 33, effective April 7; (6) amended, p. 861, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(4)(a)(II) amended, p. 116, § 1, effective August 3.

L. 2008:

(2)(c) amended, p. 771, § 6, effective May 14; IP(2), IP(3), (4)(a), (4)(b), (4)(c), and (6) amended, p. 1476, § 16, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

(6) amended, (SB 09-160), ch. 292, p. 1457, § 12, effective May 21.

L. 2011:

(1)(a) and (4)(b) amended, (SB 11-052), ch. 232, p. 1000, § 8, effective May 27; entire section amended, (SB 11-245), ch. 201, p. 842, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(3)(b), (6), and (8) amended, (HB 13-1219), ch. 104, p. 365, § 19, effective August 7.

L. 2015:

IP(2) and (2)(c) amended, (HB 15-1323), ch. 204, p. 728, § 44, effective May 20.

L. 2019:

(2)(c.5) added and (2)(d) amended, (SB 19-190), ch. 153, p. 1820, § 4, effective May 10.

L. 2020:

(2)(c.7) added, (HB 20-1128), ch. 86, p. 346, § 6, effective March 24; (2), (4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(III), (4)(b), (4)(d), and (6) amended, (4)(a)(I.5) added, and (8) repealed, (SB 20-158), ch. 198, p. 972, § 8, effective June 30; (2)(d.5) added, (HB 20-1312), ch. 258, p. 1251, § 2, effective July 8.

L. 2021:

(6) amended, (HB 21-1010), ch. 375, p. 2480, § 2, effective September 7.

23-1-121.1. Commission directive - approval of principal preparation programs - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1350, § 1, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2005. (See L. 2002, p. 1350.)

23-1-121.2. Department directive - educator preparation pathways - public information.

By October 1, 2020, the department shall post on the department website a description of each of the existing programs and pathways that lead to teacher licensure, including alternative teacher preparation programs approved pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22, teacher preparation programs approved pursuant to section 23-1-121, teacher residency programs, student teacher programs, concurrent enrollment programs, teacher cadet programs, grow your own educator programs established pursuant to section 22-60.5-208.5, and the teaching fellowship programs created pursuant to part 3 of article 78 of this title 23. The department shall annually update the descriptions of programs and pathways.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-158), ch. 198, p. 976, § 9, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2974, § 45, effective August 10.

23-1-121.3. Commission directive - principal and administrator preparation programs. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 43, § 2, effective March 20.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-245), ch. 201, p. 846, § 3, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 201, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-1-121.5. Commission directive - education in special education. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 1786, § 3, effective June 3.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-245), ch. 201, p. 850, § 14, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act repealing this section, see section 1 of chapter 201, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

23-1-121.7. Commission directive - paraprofessional programs.

The general assembly finds that:

The number of paraprofessionals who assist teachers in the classroom has increased in recent years both in absolute numbers and as a proportion of all instructional staff;

Paraprofessionals are a valuable asset to school districts, providing many hours of additional instructional time for students, especially as public schools are called upon to provide increasing services for children with disabilities and children for whom English is a second language;

As parents are requesting and school districts are attempting to provide smaller class sizes, the prudent use of well-qualified paraprofessionals to maximize individualized instruction provides school districts with a means to reach every student and to assist every student in reaching his or her full potential;

In passing the "No Child Left Behind Act of 2001", Public Law 107-110, congress has expressed the intention that all paraprofessionals working in Title I programs be highly qualified;

A paraprofessional working in a Title I program may demonstrate that he or she is highly qualified in several ways, including completion of at least two years of postsecondary study, obtaining an associates or higher degree, or successfully taking an assessment selected by the state or by the employing school district that meets state and federal standards and that demonstrates knowledge of and the ability to assist in instruction of reading, writing, and mathematics;

Because state and federal laws identify specific criteria for paraprofessional qualification and school districts retain flexibility for using paraprofessional instructional support services, further regulation of paraprofessionals, including certification or licensing, is not required;

To assist school districts in identifying highly qualified paraprofessionals, community colleges and four-year institutions of higher education are strongly encouraged to provide education paraprofessional preparation programs, and it is useful to create a procedure for approval of education paraprofessional preparation programs.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "paraprofessional" means a person who is trained to assist a licensed teacher or special services provider.

Repealed.

At a minimum, an approved education paraprofessional preparation program shall:

Be aligned with federal and state standards for paraprofessionals;

Consist of courses designed to convey to a student knowledge in reading, writing, mathematics, and science, and the skills necessary to assist a licensed teacher in teaching reading, writing, mathematics, and science;

Be aligned with statewide transfer agreements.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1040, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 2011:

(3) repealed, (SB 11-245), ch. 201, p. 850, § 15, effective August 10.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration in the 2011 act repealing subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 201, Session Laws of Colorado 2011.

(2) For the Title I requirements for hiring teachers and paraprofessionals, see 20 U.S.C. sec. 6319.